Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4670.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 12B of chapter 76 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 95, the words “five thousand dollars”
and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- $15,000.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect immediately upon passage
of 1